Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1806
Property subject to forfeiture.

In addition to the penalties provided in the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, a sentencing court may order forfeiture as provided in sections 28-1601 to 28-1603.

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 28-1463.06;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 6.

Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, see section 28-1801.